Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.067

Purchase of additional benefits—Conditions.

A member may purchase additional benefits subject to the following:

(1) The member shall pay all reasonable administrative and clerical costs; and

(2) The member shall make a member reserve contribution to be actuarially converted to a monthly benefit at the time of retirement.

[ 1992 c 212 s 13; 1991 c 278 s 2.]